District of Columbia statutes.
6-703.09

Injunction to restrain use of building in violation of §§ 6-703.03 to 6-703.09.

The Superior Court of the District of Columbia, in term time or in vacation, may upon a petition of the District of Columbia filed by its said Mayor, issue an injunction to restrain the use or occupation of any building in the District of Columbia in violation of any of the provisions of §§ 6-703.03 to 6-703.09 or of the regulations promulgated under §§ 6-703.03 to 6-703.09 by the owner, lessee, or occupant.

Dec. 24, 1942, 56 Stat. 1085, ch. 818, § 7
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(17)
1981 Ed., § 5-524.
1973 Ed., § 5-323.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.